Washington statutes.
RCW 15.35.070

Powers conferred to be liberally construed—Monopoly—Price setting.

It is the intent of the legislature that the powers conferred in this chapter shall be liberally construed. Nothing in this chapter shall be construed as permitting or authorizing the development of conditions of monopoly in the production or distribution of milk, nor shall this chapter give the director authority to establish wholesale or retail prices for processed milk products.

[ 1993 c 345 s 5; 1991 c 239 s 3; 1971 ex.s. c 230 s 7.]